Maryland, session 2026, SB0947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
11–203.
(L) THIS DIVISION II DOES NOT APPLY TO MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS ON EXISTING AND DEFINED
FIXED GUIDEWAY SYSTEMS.
Article – Transportation
7–201.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE” MEANS:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION’S BALTIMORE–AREA LOCAL BUS;
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION’S BALTIMORE–AREA LIGHT RAIL;
(III) THE ADMINISTRATION’S BALTIMORE–AREA METRO
SUBWAY; AND
(IV) THE ADMINISTRATION’S BALTIMORE–AREA PARATRANSIT.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(3) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR BALTIMORE
CORE TRANSIT SERVICE.
(B) THERE IS A BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT
SERVICE IN THE ADMINISTRATION.
(C) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING VOTING MEMBERS:
(I) FIVE MEMBERS WHO LIVE IN THE BALTIMORE CORE
TRANSIT SERVICE AREA, APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR WITH THE ADVICE AND
CONSENT OF THE SENATE, INCLUDING:
1. AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO USES TRANSIT IN THE
BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE AREA;
2. AT LEAST ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS RIDERS
WITH ACCESSIBILITY CHALLENGES;
3. AT LEAST ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING AN ANCHOR
INSTITUTION THAT ALSO PROVIDES TRANSPORTATION SERVICES IN THE
BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE AREA; AND
4. ONE MEMBER WHO IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE
ADMINISTRATION AND IS A MEMBER OF A THE LABOR UNION REPRESENTING THE
PLURALITY OF FRONTLINE WORKERS THAT HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING
AGREEMENT WITH THE ADMINISTRATION;
(II) TWO MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE MAYOR OF BALTIMORE
CITY;
(III) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE BALTIMORE COUNTY
EXECUTIVE; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER APPOINTED BY THE ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY
EXECUTIVE.
(2) (I) THE SECRETARY AND THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL SERVE
AS NONVOTING EX OFFICIO BOARD MEMBERS.
(II) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT A STUDENT WHO
REGULARLY USES ADMINISTRATION SERVICES TO COMMUTE TO AND FROM SCHOOL
AS A NONVOTING MEMBER.
– 3 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD,
WHO SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR AT THE PLEASURE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A BOARD MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON JANUARY 1, 2027.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE
STAFF FOR THE BOARD, INCLUDING A DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR WHO SHALL SERVE
AS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND REPORT DIRECTLY TO THE ADMINISTRATOR.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE OFFICE SPACE FOR THE
BOARD.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) APPROVE MAJOR SERVICE PLANS, POLICIES, AND INITIATIVES
FOR BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE, AS DETERMINED BY THE BOARD AND
THE ADMINISTRATION ON A REASONABLE BASIS;
(2) PROVIDE ADVICE ON MAJOR PROJECT INITIATIVES, AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD AND THE ADMINISTRATION ON A REASONABLE BASIS;
(3) WITH THE CONCURRENCE OF THE ADMINISTRATOR, APPOINT
THE DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR AND CONSULT WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR ON ANY
REMOVAL OF THE DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR BY THE ADMINISTRATOR;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(4) (I) REVIEW AND APPROVE THE ADMINISTRATION’S
OPERATING AND CAPITAL BUDGET REQUESTS FOR BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT
SERVICE; AND
(II) ESTABLISH, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
AND THE ADMINISTRATION, A TIMELINE FOR REVIEW AND APPROVAL UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH:
1. THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S
BUDGET PROCESS; AND
2. UNDER WHICH THE OPERATING AND CAPITAL
BUDGET REQUESTS SHALL BE CONSIDERED APPROVED BY OPERATION OF LAW IF
THE BOARD DOES NOT TAKE ACTION WITHIN THE TIMELINE;
(5) HAVE APPROVAL AUTHORITY, SUPPORTED BY AT LEAST
TWO–THIRDS OF THE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD, OVER ANY DECISION BY THE
DEPARTMENT OR THE ADMINISTRATION TO WITHDRAW A NEW STARTS CAPITAL
INVESTMENT GRANT OR ANOTHER FEDERAL GRANT UNDER A SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR PROGRAM FOR ANY BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE AREA PROJECT
ONCE THAT PROJECT HAS BEEN ACCEPTED INTO THE ENGINEERING PHASE BY THE
FEDERAL TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION;
(6) (I) MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY; AND
(II) ACCEPT PUBLIC COMMENTS DURING THE MEETINGS AND,
AT ALL TIMES, ELECTRONICALLY;
(7) INCLUDE IN THE QUARTERLY AGENDA EACH OF THE FOLLOWING
TOPICS AT LEAST ONCE EACH YEAR:
(I) THE CAPITAL NEEDS INVENTORY REPORT;
(II) THE CONSOLIDATED TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM
PRIORITIES AND INITIAL BUDGET REQUESTS UNDER § 2–103.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
AND
(III) ANY UPDATE ON THE CENTRAL MARYLAND REGIONAL
TRANSIT PLAN UNDER § 7–301.1 OF THIS TITLE;
(8) PROVIDE INPUT AND ENGAGE IN ADVOCACY FOR BALTIMORE
CORE TRANSIT SERVICE;
– 5 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(9) (I) REQUEST AND REVIEW INFORMATION FROM THE ANNUAL
ATTAINMENT REPORT AND THE ADMINISTRATION CONCERNING THE ATTAINMENT
OF THE ADMINISTRATION’S GOALS, INCLUDING PERFORMANCE GOALS AND
METRICS;
(II) EVALUATE ANY OTHER MEASURES OF THE PERFORMANCE
OF BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE; AND
(III) ISSUE WRITTEN RECOMMENDATIONS CONCERNING HOW
THE RESULTS OF THE BOARD’S REVIEW AND EVALUATION SHOULD INFLUENCE THE
ADMINISTRATION’S PRIORITIES IN FUTURE YEARS;
(10) REVIEW SERVICE CHANGE REPORTS AND APPROVE MAJOR
SERVICE CHANGE PROPOSALS;
(11) REVIEW AND APPROVE ANY UPDATE TO THE CENTRAL
MARYLAND REGIONAL TRANSIT PLAN;
(12) REVIEW AND APPROVE THE CAPITAL NEEDS INVENTORY
REPORT;
(13) REVIEW LOCAL TRANSIT PLANS AND SERVICES IN THE
BALTIMORE REGION TO ENSURE COORDINATION BETWEEN THE LOCAL TRANSIT
SERVICES AND BALTIMORE CORE TRANSIT SERVICE;
(14) ORGANIZE AND ESTABLISH POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR THE
OPERATIONS OF THE BOARD, INCLUDING CONFLICT OF INTEREST STANDARDS,
CONSISTENT WITH TITLE 5 OF THE GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND § 7–211 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, THAT PROHIBIT A BOARD MEMBER FROM HAVING ANY
INAPPROPRIATE FINANCIAL PROFESSIONAL, FINANCIAL, OR NONFINANCIAL
INTEREST IN A MATTER OVER WHICH THE BOARD HAS JURISDICTION;
(15) NOT LATER THAN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE BOARD FIRST MEETS,
ADOPT BYLAWS TO GOVERN THE OPERATIONS OF THE BOARD;
(16) (I) KEEP MINUTES OF BOARD MEETINGS AND MAINTAIN
PROPER RECORDS OF ALL BOARD ACTIVITY; AND
(II) POST ALL MINUTES, RECORDS, NOTICES, COMMENTS, OR
OTHER INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE BOARD OR RECEIVED FROM THE PUBLIC ON A
PUBLIC WEBSITE ESTABLISHED AND MAINTAINED BY THE BOARD; AND
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(17) (I) SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND
TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE
HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON SYSTEM PERFORMANCE, TRENDS, MAJOR
PROJECTS, AND OTHER ACTIVITIES; AND
(II) MAKE THE REPORT AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC
AND ENSURE THAT THE REPORT IS READILY AVAILABLE ON THE WEBSITE OF THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(H) (1) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT A TIME AND PLACE DESIGNATED BY
THE CHAIR.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AS OFTEN AS ITS DUTIES REQUIRE, BUT
NOT LESS THAN QUARTERLY.
7–201.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE COMMUTER SERVICES ADVISORY BOARD.
(3) “COMMUTER SERVICE” MEANS THE ADMINISTRATION’S:
(I) MARC COMMUTER MARYLAND AREA REGIONAL
COMMUTER (MARC) TRAIN SERVICE; AND
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION’S COMMUTER COMMUTER BUS
SERVICE.
(B) THERE IS A COMMUTER SERVICES ADVISORY BOARD IN THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(C) (1) THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING VOTING MEMBERS,
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR:
(I) THE SECRETARY, OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(II) SIX MEMBERS WHO RESIDE IN AREAS SERVED BY MARC OR
ADMINISTRATION COMMUTER BUSES;
– 7 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) ONE MEMBER WHO REPRESENTS RIDERS WITH
ACCESSIBILITY CHALLENGES; AND
(IV) ONE MEMBER WHO IS AN EMPLOYEE OF AN
ADMINISTRATION COMMUTER SERVICE CONTRACTOR AND IS A MEMBER OF A LABOR
UNION THAT HAS A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT WITH THE COMMUTER
SERVICE CONTRACTOR.
(2) THE GOVERNOR SHALL DESIGNATE THE CHAIR OF THE BOARD,
WHO SHALL SERVE AS CHAIR AT THE PLEASURE OF THE GOVERNOR.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A BOARD MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY
THE TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD ON JANUARY 1, 2027.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE
STAFF FOR THE BOARD, INCLUDING A DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR WHO SHALL SERVE
AS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND REPORT DIRECTLY TO THE ADMINISTRATOR.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE OFFICE SPACE FOR THE
BOARD.
(F) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE BOARD;
BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(G) THE BOARD SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE ADVICE AND GUIDANCE ON MARC AND COMMUTER BUS
PLANS AND POLICIES;
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(2) REVIEW AND COMMENT ON MAJOR MARC AND COMMUTER BUS
SERVICE PLANS AND UPDATES;
(3) PROVIDE ADVICE AND GUIDANCE ON THE HIRING AND REMOVAL
OF THE DEPUTY ADMINISTRATOR;
(4) (I) REVIEW AND COMMENT ON THE ADMINISTRATION’S
OPERATING AND CAPITAL BUDGET REQUESTS FOR MARC AND COMMUTER BUS
SERVICE; AND
(II) ESTABLISH, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
AND THE ADMINISTRATION, A TIMELINE FOR REVIEW AND COMMENT UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH THAT IS CONSISTENT WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S BUDGET PROCESS;
AND
(5) (I) SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT TO THE SENATE BUDGET AND
TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, AND THE
HOUSE WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON SYSTEM PERFORMANCE, TRENDS, MAJOR
PROJECTS, AND OTHER ACTIVITIES; AND
(II) MAKE THE REPORT AVAILABLE TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC
AND ENSURE THAT THE REPORT IS READILY AVAILABLE ON THE WEBSITE OF THE
ADMINISTRATION.
(H) (1) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AT A TIME AND PLACE DESIGNATED BY
THE CHAIR.
(2) THE BOARD SHALL MEET AS OFTEN AS THE DUTIES REQUIRE, BUT
NOT LESS THAN QUARTERLY.
7–206.
(a) (1) Without regard to the laws of this State relating to other State
employees, and subject to § 2–103.4 of this article, the Administration may:
(i) Create and abolish any position other than one specifically
provided for in this title; and
(ii) Determine the qualification, appointment, removal, term, and
tenure of its employees.
(2) The Administration may determine the compensation of:
– 9 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Employees if the compensation is determined pursuant to
Subtitle 6 of this title;
(ii) Executive management positions, as recommended by the
Secretary and approved by the Governor, subject to approval in the budget; and
(iii) Management positions, subject to approval by the Secretary and
the Governor and the availability of funds in the budget.
(b) (1) Subject to § 2–103.4 of this article, the Administration may establish a
personnel system based on merit and fitness.
(2) The Administration may:
(i) Subject to Division II of the State Personnel and Pensions
Article, participate in the Employees’ Retirement System and the Employees’ Pension
System of the State of Maryland on terms and conditions mutually acceptable to the
Administration and the Board of Trustees for the State Retirement and Pension System;
and
(ii) Establish and maintain an independent system of pensions and
retirement benefits for its employees.
(c) The Administrator may appoint and remove all employees of the
Administration, subject to the rules of procedure and standards that the Secretary adopts.
(D) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION SHALL DETERMINE THE
QUALIFICATIONS AND APPOINTMENTS, AS WELL AS COMPENSATION AND LEAVE,
FOR UP TO 12 MANAGEMENT PERSONNEL POSITIONS REQUIRED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION TO OPERATE AND ADMINISTER ALL STATE–OWNED TRANSIT
FACILITIES.
(2) (I) IN MAKING DETERMINATIONS AND APPOINTMENTS UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION, THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION SHALL
CONSIDER THE COMPARATIVE STATUS OF EMPLOYEES SERVING IN SIMILAR
POSITIONS AND DISCHARGING SIMILAR DUTIES AT COMPARABLE TRANSIT
AGENCIES.
(II) IN SELECTING COMPARABLE TRANSIT AGENCIES, THE
MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION SHALL CONSIDER OPERATIONAL AND
TRAFFIC DATA, MARKET AREA CHARACTERISTICS, AGENCY COMPETITIVENESS, AND
ANY OTHER FACTORS THE COMMISSION CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(3) EXCEPT FOR GENERAL SALARY INCREASES APPROVED BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT AT LEAST 10 DAYS
BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF ANY MANAGEMENT PERSONNEL POSITION SALARY
INCREASE NOTICE OF THE PROPOSED ADJUSTMENT.
(4) THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE PROPOSED ADJUSTMENT; AND
(II) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE PROPOSED
ADJUSTMENT, ADVISE THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION WHETHER
THE ADJUSTMENT POSES AN ADVERSE IMPACT ON SPECIAL FUND EXPENDITURES.
(5) FAILURE OF THE SECRETARY OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT TO
ADVISE THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION COMMISSION IN A TIMELY MANNER
SHALL BE DEEMED A DETERMINATION THAT THE PROPOSED ADJUSTMENT POSES
NO ADVERSE IMPACT.
(6) EMPLOYEES APPOINTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ARE STATE
EMPLOYEES AND SHALL BE ENTITLED TO PARTICIPATE IN THE RETIREMENT AND
PENSION SYSTEMS FOR EMPLOYEES OF THE STATE OF MARYLAND AUTHORIZED
UNDER DIVISION II OF THE STATE PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE.
[7–213.
(a) There is a Baltimore Regional Transit Commission.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) The following six members from Baltimore City, appointed as follows:
(i) Three members appointed by the Governor, including:
1. At least one member who uses transit in the Baltimore
region; and
2. At least one member from the business community; and
(ii) Three members appointed by the Mayor of Baltimore City;
(2) The following four members from Baltimore County, appointed as
follows:
– 11 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Two members appointed by the Governor, including:
1. At least one member who uses transit in the Baltimore
region; and
2. At least one member from the business community; and
(ii) Two members appointed by the County Executive of Baltimore
County;
(3) The following two members from Anne Arundel County, appointed as
follows:
(i) One member appointed by the Governor; and
(ii) One member appointed by the County Executive of Anne
Arundel County;
(4) The following two members from Howard County, appointed as follows:
(i) One member appointed by the Governor; and
(ii) One member appointed by the County Executive of Howard
County;
(5) One nonvoting member who is an employee of the Administration and
is a member of the Amalgamated Transit Union local labor union, designated by the labor
union; and
(6) The Secretary or the Secretary’s designee, who shall vote only in the
case of a tie.
(c) (1) The Commission shall select a chair and a vice chair from among its
members.
(2) The chair and vice chair shall each serve a term of 2 years in those
capacities.
(d) (1) The term of a commissioner is 3 years.
(2) A commissioner may not serve more than two consecutive terms.
(3) The term of a commissioner begins January 1, 2024.
(4) The terms of the members are staggered as required by the terms
provided for members of the Commission on January 1, 2024.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(5) At the end of a term, a commissioner continues to serve until a successor
is appointed.
(e) (1) The Baltimore Metropolitan Council shall provide staff for the
Commission.
(2) The Administration shall allocate funds for operational expenses
incurred by the Commission, including funding for one senior planner and two junior
planner staffing positions.
(f) A member of the Commission:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Commission shall:
(1) Organize and establish policies and procedures for the operations of the
Commission, including conflict of interest standards that prohibit a commissioner from
having any inappropriate financial or nonfinancial interest in a matter over which the
Commission has jurisdiction;
(2) Not later than 6 months after the Commission first meets, adopt bylaws
to govern the operations of the Commission;
(3) (i) Meet at least quarterly; and
(ii) Accept public comments during the meetings and, at all times,
electronically;
(4) Include in the quarterly agenda each of the following topics at least once
each year:
(i) The Capital Needs Inventory Report;
(ii) The Consolidated Transportation Program priorities and initial
budget requests under § 2–103.1 of this article; and
(iii) Any update on the Central Maryland Regional Transit Plan
under § 7–301.1 of this title;
(5) (i) Keep minutes of Commission meetings and maintain proper
records of all Commission activity; and
– 13 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) Post all minutes, records, notices, comments, or other
information issued by the Commission or received from the public on a public website
established and maintained by the Commission;
(6) Provide input and engage in advocacy for the Baltimore region public
transit systems maintained by the Administration;
(7) Request and review information from the Annual Attainment Report
and the Administration concerning the attainment of the Administration’s goals, including
performance goals and metrics, evaluate any other measures of the performance of the
Baltimore region transit system, and issue written recommendations concerning how the
results of the Commission’s review and evaluation should influence the Administration’s
priorities in future years;
(8) Review and comment on service change reports and major service
change proposals on a quarterly basis;
(9) Review and comment on the Administration’s annual operating and
capital budget request for the Baltimore region, including bus, light rail, metro, commuter
bus, MARC service, and paratransit as part of the development of the draft and final
Consolidated Transportation Program;
(10) Review and approve any update to the Central Maryland Regional
Transit Plan;
(11) Review and comment on the Capital Needs Inventory Report; and
(12) Review local transit plans and services in the Baltimore region to
ensure coordination between the local transit services and the Administration.
(h) In carrying out its duties under subsection (g) of this section, the Commission
shall endeavor to ensure that the Administration’s plans, budgets, decisions, policies, goals,
priorities, operations, and services address the public transit needs of residents and
businesses in the Baltimore region.
(i) On or before December 1 each year, the Commission shall report its findings
and recommendations on the Baltimore region transit systems to the Administration, the
Governor, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General
Assembly.]
7–702.
(a) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Administration is liable for its
contracts and torts and for the torts of its officers, agents, and employees in connection with
the performance of the duties and functions of the Administration under this title.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(b) (1) The exclusive remedy for a breach of contract or for a tort committed by
the Administration, its officers, agents, or employees is a suit against the Administration.
(2) No execution may be levied on any property of this State or of the
Administration.
(c) THE LIABILITY OF THE ADMINISTRATION AS TO A TORT ACTION MAY
NOT EXCEED $400,000 TO A SINGLE CLAIMANT FOR INJURIES ARISING FROM A
SINGLE INCIDENT OR OCCURRENCE.
(D) Subsection [(d)] (E) of this section does not apply to a tort claim that is
asserted by cross–claim, counterclaim, or third–party claim.
[(d)] (E) A tort claimant may not institute an action under this section unless:
(1) The claimant submits a written notice of claim to the Administrator or
the Administrator’s designee within 1 year after the injury to person or property that is the
basis of the claim;
(2) The Administrator or the Administrator’s designee denies the claim;
and
(3) The action is filed within 3 years after the cause of action arises.
[(e)] (F) A notice of claim under this section shall:
(1) Contain a concise statement of facts that sets forth the nature of the
claim, including the date and place of the alleged tort;
(2) State the name and address of the claimant;
(3) State the name, address, and telephone number of counsel for the
claimant, if any; and
(4) Be signed by the claimant, or the legal representative or counsel for the
claimant.
[(f)] (G) A claim under this section is denied:
(1) If the Administrator or the Administrator’s designee sends the
claimant, or the legal representative or counsel for the claimant, written notice of denial;
or
(2) If the Administrator or the Administrator’s designee fails to give notice
of a denial within 6 months after the sending of the notice of claim.
– 15 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(g)] (H) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, unless the
Administration affirmatively shows that its defense has been prejudiced by the lack of the
required notice, a court may allow the action to proceed even if the written notice of claim
was not submitted.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, (Three–fifths of all the members
elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be proposed that the Maryland
Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
40B.
The General Assembly shall enact no law authorizing private property to be taken
for public use without just compensation, to be agreed upon between the parties or awarded
by a jury, being first paid or tendered to the party entitled to such compensation, except
that where such property in the judgment of the State [Roads Commission] HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION, OR A SUCCESSOR STATE AGENCY, is needed by the State for
highway purposes OR OF THE MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION, OR A
SUCCESSOR STATE AGENCY, IS NEEDED BY THE STATE FOR TRANSIT PURPOSES, the
General Assembly may provide that such property may be taken immediately upon
payment therefor to the owner or owners thereof by said State [Roads Commission]
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION, OR ANY
RESPECTIVE SUCCESSOR STATE AGENCIES, or into Court, such amount as said State
[Roads Commission] HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION OR MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION, OR ANY RESPECTIVE STATE AGENCIES, shall estimate to be of the
fair value of said property, provided such legislation also requires the payment of any
further sum that may subsequently be awarded by a jury.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
7–401.1.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
PROPERTY IS TO BE CONDEMNED FOR A TRANSIT PURPOSE, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL CONDEMN THE NECESSARY PROPERTY UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATION CONSIDERS THE PROCEDURES UNDER
THIS SECTION INAPPROPRIATE, THE PROPERTY MAY BE CONDEMNED BY THE
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 7–401.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR TITLE 12 OF THE REAL
PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(3) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION,
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL FOLLOW THE
PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN TITLE 12 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE AND THE
MARYLAND RULES.
(B) (1) BEFORE ANY PROPERTY IS CONDEMNED UNDER THIS SECTION
THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) COMPLETE APPROPRIATE ENGINEERING AND OTHER
STUDIES; AND
(II) PREPARE A CONSTRUCTION PLAN THAT SHOWS THE
LOCATION OF THE TRANSIT FACILITY TO BE CONSTRUCTED, IMPROVED, OR
RECONSTRUCTED.
(2) AFTER PREPARING THE CONSTRUCTION PLAN, THE
ADMINISTRATION SHALL PREPARE PLATS THAT INCLUDE:
(I) THE CONSTRUCTION PLAN;
(II) THE FEE SIMPLE AND EASEMENT AREA TO BE ACQUIRED;
AND
(III) THE PROPERTY LINES OF THE PROPERTY OWNERS WHOSE
PROPERTY WILL BE AFFECTED BY THE ACQUISITION.
(3) AFTER THE PLATS ARE PREPARED, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL:
(I) MAKE THE ENGINEERING AND REAL ESTATE STUDIES,
EVALUATIONS, AND INVESTIGATIONS NECESSARY TO DETERMINE, IN ITS OPINION:
1. THE FAIR VALUE OF THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED;
AND
2. THE FAIR COMPENSATION FOR ANY RESULTING
DAMAGES TO THE REMAINING PROPERTY OF THE OWNER;
(II) PREPARE AN ESTIMATE OF THIS FAIR VALUE AND FAIR
COMPENSATION; AND
– 17 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) PROVIDE FOR PAYMENT OF THESE ESTIMATED AMOUNTS AS
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) THE PLATS PREPARED BY THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL BE FILED
FOR RECORD WITH THE STATE ARCHIVES.
(2) PLATS FILED WITH THE STATE ARCHIVES SHALL BE
ELECTRONICALLY RECORDED AS PROVIDED IN § 9–1011 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
(D) (1) THE PLATS AND ESTIMATES APPROVED BY THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL BE KEPT AS PART OF THE PERMANENT RECORDS OF THE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER STATUTE TO THE CONTRARY:
(I) EXCEPT AS ALLOWED BY THE ADMINISTRATION, THE PLATS
PREPARED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ARE NOT PUBLIC INFORMATION OR OPEN TO
PUBLIC INSPECTION UNTIL THEY HAVE BEEN RECORDED; AND
(II) EXCEPT WHEN FILED WITH A BOARD OF PROPERTY REVIEW
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–327 OF THIS ARTICLE OR A COURT, THE ESTIMATES
PREPARED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ARE NOT PUBLIC INFORMATION OR OPEN TO
PUBLIC INSPECTION UNTIL ALL THE PROPERTY SHOWN ON THE PLATS HAS BEEN
ACQUIRED OR ITS PRICE DETERMINED.
(E) (1) AFTER THE PLATS ARE FILED FOR RECORD, THE
ADMINISTRATION IMMEDIATELY SHALL:
(I) FILE, IN THE COURT FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED IS LOCATED, A PETITION FOR CONDEMNATION THAT
INCLUDES:
1. THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PROPERTY OWNER;
2. THE LOCATION OF THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED;
AND
3. THE ESTIMATED FAIR VALUE OF THE PROPERTY TO
BE ACQUIRED AND ESTIMATED FAIR COMPENSATION FOR ANY DAMAGE RESULTING
TO THE REMAINING PROPERTY OF THE OWNER; AND
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(II) PAY TO THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR INTO THE COURT
FOR THE OWNER’S BENEFIT, THE ESTIMATED FAIR VALUE AND FAIR COMPENSATION
SPECIFIED IN THE PETITION.
(2) ON WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE CLERK OF THE COURT, THE
PROPERTY OWNER IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE ANY AMOUNT PAID INTO THE COURT
FOR THE PROPERTY OWNER’S BENEFIT, WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS OF THE
REQUEST, WITHOUT PREJUDICE TO ANY OF THE PROPERTY OWNER’S RIGHTS, IF THE
PROPERTY OWNER AGREES TO REPAY TO THE ADMINISTRATION ANY EXCESS OF
THAT AMOUNT OVER THE FINAL AWARD THAT IS ALLOWED IN THE SUBSEQUENT
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS.
(3) A PAYMENT MADE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT IN ANY
WAY THE AMOUNT OF THE FINAL AWARD THAT MAY BE ALLOWED IN THE
SUBSEQUENT CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS.
(F) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AFTER THE PETITION IS FILED AND PAYMENT IS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY TAKE POSSESSION OF THE
PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED, AS SHOWN ON THE RECORDED PLATS;
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION MAY PROCEED WITH
CONSTRUCTION WITHOUT INTERFERENCE BY THE OWNER; AND
(III) WITH THE PERMISSION OF THE ADMINISTRATION AND
UNDER ITS SUPERVISION, ANY PUBLIC OR PRIVATE UTILITY MAY INSTALL ITS
FACILITIES ON ANY LAND BEING ACQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATION IN FEE
SIMPLE.
(2) UNLESS THE OWNER AGREES OTHERWISE, IF A DWELLING OR
PLACE OF BUSINESS IS TAKEN, THE RESIDENT OR OCCUPANT NEED NOT VACATE THE
DWELLING OR PLACE OF BUSINESS UNTIL THE TITLE TO THE PROPERTY HAS BEEN
ACQUIRED BY DEED OR CONDEMNATION.
(G) (1) AFTER THE PETITION IS FILED AND PAYMENT IS MADE UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL SEEK TO ACQUIRE
THE PROPERTY BY AMICABLE NEGOTIATION.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF THESE NEGOTIATIONS, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL DETERMINE THE VALUE OF THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED AS OF THE DATE
– 19 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
THE PAYMENT IS MADE TO THE PROPERTY OWNER OR INTO COURT UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(H) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
THE ADMINISTRATION IS UNABLE TO ACQUIRE THE PROPERTY BY NEGOTIATION, IT
SHALL CERTIFY THE CASE TO THE BOARD OF PROPERTY REVIEW FOR THE COUNTY
IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED, AS PROVIDED IN THE MARYLAND RULES.
(2) A CASE SHALL BE FILED AS A CONDEMNATION CASE IN THE COURT
FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY IS LOCATED AND MAY NOT BE HEARD BY
A BOARD OF PROPERTY REVIEW IF:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT VALID,
MARKETABLE TITLE IS UNOBTAINABLE WITHOUT A COURT PROCEEDING; OR
(II) A NONRESIDENT HAS AN INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY AND
WILL NOT ACCEPT SERVICE OF PROCESS AND AGREE TO THE BOARD’S
JURISDICTION.
(I) IF, WITHIN 1 YEAR AFTER PAYMENT IS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION FAILS TO ASCERTAIN THE ENTIRE AMOUNT TO
BE PAID FOR THE PROPERTY AND ACQUIRE TITLE TO IT BY DEED OR CONDEMNATION
OR, WITHIN THAT SAME 1–YEAR PERIOD, FAILS TO FILE TIMELY A PETITION FOR
CONDEMNATION AS REQUIRED BY THE MARYLAND RULES, THEN THE FAIR VALUE
OF THE PROPERTY SHALL BE THE GREATER OF THE VALUES DETERMINED AS OF:
(1) THE DATE THE TITLE TO THE PROPERTY IS ACQUIRED; AND
(2) THE DATE THE PAYMENT WAS MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION.
(J) AT THE CONCLUSION OF ALL PROCEEDINGS, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL PAY TO THE PROPERTY OWNER:
(1) ANY EXCESS OF THE FINAL AWARD OVER THE AMOUNT PAID
UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) INTEREST ON THE EXCESS FROM THE DATE OF PAYMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION AT THE RATE OF 6% A YEAR.
7–401.2.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(A) (1) IF THE ADMINISTRATION DETERMINES THAT CONDEMNATION
UNDER § 7–401.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS INAPPROPRIATE, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY
ACQUIRE PROPERTY BY CONDEMNATION UNDER THIS SECTION, AFTER MAKING
EVERY REASONABLE AND GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO NEGOTIATE.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION,
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL FOLLOW THE
PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN TITLE 12 OF THE REAL PROPERTY ARTICLE AND THE
MARYLAND RULES.
(B) TO CONDEMN PROPERTY UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL:
(1) FILE A PETITION FOR CONDEMNATION IN THE COURT FOR THE
COUNTY IN WHICH THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED IS LOCATED; AND
(2) PAY TO THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY OR INTO THE COURT FOR
THE OWNER’S BENEFIT, THE AMOUNT THAT THE ADMINISTRATION ESTIMATES TO
BE THE FAIR VALUE OF THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED AND FAIR COMPENSATION
FOR ANY DAMAGE RESULTING TO THE REMAINING PROPERTY OF THE OWNER.
(C) AFTER THE PETITION IS FILED AND PAYMENT IS MADE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) TAKE POSSESSION OF THE PROPERTY TO BE ACQUIRED; AND
(2) PROCEED WITH CONSTRUCTION WITHOUT INTERFERENCE BY THE
OWNER.
(D) ON WRITTEN REQUEST TO THE CLERK OF THE COURT, THE PROPERTY
OWNER IS ENTITLED TO RECEIVE ANY AMOUNT PAID INTO THE COURT FOR THE
PROPERTY OWNER’S BENEFIT WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS OF THE REQUEST,
WITHOUT PREJUDICE TO ANY OF THE PROPERTY OWNER’S RIGHTS, IF THE
PROPERTY OWNER AGREES TO REPAY TO THE ADMINISTRATION ANY EXCESS OF
THAT AMOUNT OVER THE FINAL AWARD THAT IS ALLOWED IN THE SUBSEQUENT
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS.
(E) A PAYMENT MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT
LIMIT IN ANY WAY THE AMOUNT OF THE FINAL AWARD THAT MAY BE ALLOWED IN
THE SUBSEQUENT CONDEMNATION PROCEEDINGS.
– 21 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) AT THE CONCLUSION OF ALL PROCEEDINGS, THE ADMINISTRATION
SHALL PAY TO THE PROPERTY OWNER ANY EXCESS OF THE FINAL AWARD OVER THE
AMOUNT PAID UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
8–327.
(a) (1) There is a board of property review in each county.
(2) If necessary, additional boards may be appointed in any county.
(b) (1) Each board of property review of a county has three members who are
appointed by the judges of the circuit court for the county.
(2) Of the members of each board:
(i) One shall be a lawyer;
(ii) One shall be a farmer engaged in some agricultural pursuit; and
(iii) One shall be an engineer or a person with an engineering
background and knowledge.
(3) A member of the General Assembly may not be a member of a board
during his term of office.
(c) (1) Each board member serves for a term of 2 years and until his successor
is appointed and qualifies.
(2) A member appointed to fill a vacancy in an unexpired term serves only
for the remainder of that term.
(d) A board member is entitled to the per diem compensation set by the Supreme
Court of Maryland. The compensation shall be uniform statewide and shall be paid monthly
by the Commission, on vouchers approved by the clerk of the court.
(e) Each board shall appoint its chairman and may adopt rules not inconsistent
with this title or the Maryland Rules.
(f) Each county shall provide a suitable place for its board to meet and, whenever
possible, the clerk of the court shall provide suitable clerical assistance. If the clerk fails to
provide clerical assistance, the Administration OR THE MARYLAND TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION, AS APPROPRIATE, shall provide it on request of the board.
(g) Each board is under the jurisdiction of the court and each member of the board
is an officer of the court.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
8–328.
(a) Each board of property review:
(1) Shall hear promptly all cases certified to it by the Commission OR THE
MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION;
(2) Shall determine the total amount of the award to be paid by the
Commission OR THE MARYLAND TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION; and
(3) May determine the portion of an award to be paid to persons, other than
the fee owner, who have an interest in the property.
(b) Unless all parties in a case certified to a board agree otherwise, the full board
shall hear and decide the case. If a member of the board is absent or disqualified from
hearing or deciding any case, the judges of the court that appointed the board shall
designate another individual with qualifications similar to those of the absent or
disqualified member to serve instead.
(c) The board shall determine the fair value of the property to be acquired as of
the date payment is made under § 7–401.1 OR § 7–401.2 OF THIS ARTICLE OR § 8–323
of this subtitle.
8–329.
If any party is dissatisfied with the findings or award of a board of property review,
the case may be appealed to the court. On appeal, the court shall hear and determine the
case de novo, as provided by law and the Maryland Rules.
SECTION 4. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding § 7–201.1
of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, the initial terms of the
Board of Directors for Baltimore Core Transit Service established under this Act shall be
staggered as follows:
(1) the five members appointed by the Governor shall serve an initial term
of 4 years; and
(2) the members appointed by the Mayor of Baltimore City, the Baltimore
County Executive, and the Anne Arundel County Executive shall serve an initial term of 3
years.
SECTION 5. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding § 7–201.2
of the Transportation Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, the initial terms of the
Commuter Services Advisory Board established under this Act shall be staggered as
follows:
– 23 –

Ch. 419 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) of the six members who reside in areas served by MARC or Maryland
Transit Administration commuter buses, three members shall serve an initial term of 4
years and three members shall serve an initial term of 3 years;
(2) the member who represents riders with accessibility challenges shall
serve an initial term of 4 years; and
(3) the member who is an employee of a Maryland Transit Administration
commuter service contractor and is a member of a labor union that has a collective
bargaining agreement with the commuter service contractor shall serve an initial term of
3 years.
SECTION 6. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of Transportation shall contract with the Baltimore
Metropolitan Council to complete a technical study on or before December 1, 2026, that:
(1) provides findings and considerations on the creation of a rail authority
in Maryland, with the intent that this rail authority would be focused on financing for rail
services;
(2) examines peer models that may provide insight for the findings and
considerations, including models in the Commonwealth of Virginia and Austin, Texas;
(3) provides potential next steps to consider in the creation of a rail
authority in Maryland; and
(4) ensures that current rail transit services remain under the Maryland
Transit Administration and that funding options for a statewide rail authority do not
undermine future financial support for Baltimore Core Transit Services.
(b) The Baltimore Metropolitan Council may consult with the Metropolitan
Washington Council of Governments in completing the technical study.
SECTION 7. 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Maryland Transit
Administration shall:
(1) reallocate its staff to ensure sufficient support for the Board of Directors
for Baltimore Core Transit Service and the Commuter Services Advisory Board; and
(2) at a minimum establish the following staff positions:
(i) a Deputy Administrator and an analyst for the Board of Directors
for Baltimore Core Transit Service;
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 419
(ii) a Deputy Administrator and an analyst for the Commuter
Services Advisory Board; and
(iii) a support officer to be shared between the Board of Directors for
Baltimore Core Transit Service and the Commuter Services Advisory Board.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 2 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 10 of this
Act, Section 3 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.
SECTION 12. 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 9 and 11 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 25 –